District of Columbia statutes.
8-105.58

Sunset.

[Not funded].

History

Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-292, § 9, 60 DCR 2354

Editor's Notes

Section 8 of D.C. Law 19-292 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 9 of D.C. Law 19-292 provided that the act shall expire on September 30, 2014.